Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4631
Remedy for breach of contract to appoint or not to appoint.

The remedy for a powerholder's breach of a contract to appoint or not to appoint appointive property is limited to damages payable out of the appointive property or, if appropriate, specific performance of the contract.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 54.